Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2938
Commission; duties.

(1) The commission shall adopt and maintain internal control policies, investment standards, and risk management frameworks to ensure prudent fiscal operations.

(2) Such controls shall comply with applicable state auditing, ethics, and administrative procedures.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 38.
July 18, 2026